Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2128
Certified master social worker; certified social worker; qualifications.

(1) A person shall be qualified to be a certified master social worker if he or she:

(a) Has a doctorate or a master's degree in social work from an approved educational program;

(b) Has had a minimum of at least three thousand hours of experience, in addition to the master's or doctorate degree, in social work under the supervision as defined in section 38-2127 of a certified master social worker;

(c) Provides evidence to the department that he or she meets the requirements of subdivisions (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section; and

(d) Completes an application and satisfactorily passes an examination approved by the board.

(2) A person shall be qualified to be a certified social worker if he or she provides evidence to the board that he or she has a baccalaureate or master's degree in social work from an approved educational program and completes an application form.

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 15;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 85;

Laws 1990, LB 1080, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 71-1,258;

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 38;

Laws 1993, LB 506, § 1;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 101;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 161;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,319;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 745.

Credentialing, general requirements and issuance procedures, see section 38-121 et seq.